Maine, session 132, LD1201.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 38 MRSA §1614, sub-§4, ¶F, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 630, §1, is
amended by amending subparagraph (3) to read:
(3) The United States Environmental Protection Agency pursuant to the Federal
Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act, except that any such products
approved by the United States Environmental Protection Agency pursuant to that
law for aerial or land application are not exempt from this section;
Sec. 2. 38 MRSA §1614, sub-§4, ¶F-1 is enacted to read:
F-1. A pesticide registered by the United States Environmental Protection Agency
pursuant to the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act applied by a person
licensed by the Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry, Board of
Pesticides Control as an agricultural basic applicator, a private applicator or a
commercial applicator;